District of Columbia statutes.
7-2307

Violation of emergency executive order.

An emergency executive order issued by the Mayor may provide for a fine of not more than $1,000 for each violation. The Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia or any Assistant Corporation Counsel may bring an action in the name of the District of Columbia against anyone who has violated the provisions of an emergency executive order issued pursuant to this chapter.

History

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-149, § 8, 27 DCR 4886

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1507.